Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1252
Fireworks;
State Fire Marshal; rules and regulations; enforcement of sections.

The State Fire Marshal shall adopt and promulgate reasonable
rules and regulations for the enforcement of sections 28-1239.01 and 28-1241
to 28-1252 and, together with all peace officers of the state and its political
subdivisions, shall be charged with the enforcement of sections 28-1239.01
and 28-1243 to 28-1252.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 284;

Laws 1989, LB 215, § 17;

Laws 2010, LB880, § 10.